North Carolina, session 2025, SB848.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "Rio's Law."
SECTION 2. G.S. 17C-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17C-6. Powers of Commission.
(a) In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the
Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and
regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of G.S. 17C-10:
…
(17) Establish minimum educational and training standards for employment and
continuing education for criminal justice officers concerning:concerning all
of the following:
a. Recognizing and appropriately interacting with (i) persons who are
deaf or hard of hearing.hearing and (ii) persons with autism spectrum
disorder.
…
c. Recognizing the autism spectrum disorder special registration plate
issued pursuant to G.S. 20-79.4.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 17E-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17E-4. Powers and duties of the Commission.
(a) The Commission shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities, which
are enforceable through its rules and regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of
G.S. 17E-8 and G.S. 17E-9:
…
(13) Establish minimum educational and training standards for employment and
continuing education for officers concerning:concerning all of the following:
a. Recognizing and appropriately interacting with (i) persons who are
deaf or hard of hearing.hearing and (ii) persons with autism spectrum
disorder.
…
c. Recognizing the autism spectrum disorder special registration plate
issued pursuant to G.S. 20-79.4.
…."
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 20-79.4(b) reads as rewritten:
*S848-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
() Autism Spectrum Disorder Designation. – Issuable to a person with autism
spectrum disorder, as defined in G.S. 58-3-192. The plate shall bear the phrase
"Autistic/Neurodivergent" and a "Just Bee" logo approved by Just Bee, Inc.
For the purposes of this subdivision, a person shall be considered to have
autism spectrum disorder if the person provides verification or documentation
substantiating a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder. The Division shall
identify acceptable forms of verification that do not result in undue burden to
the person requesting the designation of autism spectrum disorder. Acceptable
documentation shall include documentation of certification or examination by
a medical, health, or mental health professional showing evidence of autism
spectrum disorder.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) The Revisor of Statutes is authorized to alphabetize, number, and
renumber the special registration plates listed in G.S. 20-79.4(b) to ensure that all of the special
registration plates are listed in alphabetical order and numbered accordingly.
SECTION 5.(a) The Medical Care Commission (Commission) and the North
Carolina Office of Emergency Medical Services (NCOEMS) shall adopt rules under
G.S. 131E-159 to require all emergency medical services personnel, as defined in G.S. 131E-155,
to receive certified autism and neurodiversity training to be credentialed under Article 7 of
Chapter 131E of the General Statutes.
SECTION 5.(b) By October 1, 2027, the Commission and NCOEMS shall
implement certified autism and neurodiversity training for all new credentialed emergency
medical services personnel as a requirement for initial credentialing under NCAC Title 10A
Subchapter 13P (NCAC). By October 1, 2028, completion of certified autism and neurodiversity
training shall be required for credential renewal for emergency medical services personnel. The
Commission and NCOEMS may contract with any association that meets the National
Emergency Medical Services Education Standards, consistent with NCAC requirements.
SECTION 6. By October 1, 2027, the State Fire and Rescue Commission shall,
pursuant to G.S. 58-78-5, incorporate certified autism and neurodiversity training into the State
Fire Education and Training Plan, the State Master Plan for Fire Prevention and Control, a Rescue
Training Plan, and the State Master Plan for Rescue Services.
SECTION 7. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 848-First Edition